[1]              
This case proceeded to trial remotely.  Counsel attended
by Zoom and all witnesses called by the parties testified by Zoom.  The trial
was set for eight days in February 2022 but was not completed in that time and
a further 12 days were needed to complete this trial.
[2]              
Due to the length of the trial and the nature of
the case, the court requested written submissions to be prepared and filed.  There
was a delay in releasing this decision due to personal circumstances that I experienced,
and extensions were granted with the approval of the Chief Justice.
[3]              
The case before the court involves the
plaintiffs’ claim that they were unlawfully arrested and subjected to unlawful
force by police authorities during the course of their arrest.  The plaintiffs
claim that as a result of the actions of the defendants, which amount to false
arrest and battery, that they have suffered injuries and are entitled to
damages as a result.
[4]              
The plaintiff, Daniel Knox, is the father of the
plaintiffs, Harrison Knox, and Sherry Cole.  The plaintiff, Daniel Knox,
operates a company known as “Tree Men & A Chainsaw”.   This is a tree and
hedge maintenance company with approximately six employees.  Harrison Knox was
employed by this company as a head arborist and from time to time, Sherry Cole
was also employed by the corporation.
[5]              
Two other employees of the corporation were
Calvin Lynn and Daniel Campbell.  On June 11, 2014, Lynn and Campbell were
travelling in a red company truck in a northerly direction on Highway 17
North.  Harrison Knox was in a separate company vehicle travelling in the same
direction.  The company had a job scheduled at Island Lake and the vehicles
were in transit to that job.
[6]              
At one point along the route, the Tree Men &
A Chainsaw red company truck passed in a manner that was unsafe, veering into
oncoming traffic.  Vehicles that were occupied by Cindy Grenier and Wendy
Grenier, and a separate vehicle occupied by John Vanderloo Sr. and John
Vanderloo Jr. were following the red truck, and the truck with a trailer was
observed what was occurring with the red truck.
[7]              
The two Tree Men & A Chainsaw vehicles and
the Grenier vehicle and the Vanderloo vehicle pulled over at the Highway 548
turnoff to Searchmont in an old, abandoned Esso gas station lot.  When all the
vehicles arrived in the lot, the red vehicle was blocked in by the Grenier and
Vanderloo vehicles.  The Grenier vehicle pulled in front of the red truck and the
Vanderloo vehicle pulled behind the red truck.  Wendy Grenier telephoned the
Ontario Provincial Police.
[8]              
Harrison Knox telephoned his father, Daniel Knox. 
Harrison told his father that “he’d better get here quick before I hammer
someone”.  At some point, Harrison telephoned his father again to tell him that
the company vehicle was blocked in and stuck by the other vehicles and had a
flat tire.  Daniel Knox called the Ontario Provincial Police and while on Northern
Avenue within the city limits of Sault Ste. Marie, Sherry Cole made a telephone
call to the Ontario Provincial Police.  The Ontario Provincial Police
dispatcher told Sherry Knox that Daniel Knox should pull his vehicle over and
not attend at the scene.  Both Daniel Knox and Sherry Cole ignored this
direction from the Ontario Provincial Police and continued travelling out of Sault
Ste. Marie along Highway 17 North, enroute to the Esso gas station lot at
Searchmont.
[9]              
Meanwhile, at the Esso gas station parking lot
at the Searchmont turnoff, an altercation took place between Harrison Knox and
John Vanderloo Sr.  There was an attempt to extricate the red truck, which was
unsuccessful.  Vehicles collided with each other, and the red truck was left
with a flat tire.
[10]          
Officer Keith Nicolle of the Ontario Provincial
Police was the first to arrive at the Esso parking lot.  He was followed by
Officer Mario Posteraro.  Officer Nicolle was aware of a complaint of the red
truck being driven aggressively and a fight which took place in the parking
lot. Posteraro spoke to John Vanderloo Sr. who indicated that he had been
assaulted by Harrison Knox.  Posteraro observed bruising to John Vanderloo Sr. 
Harrison Knox was without injury.  Officer Posteraro placed Harrison Knox under
arrest, handcuffed him, and placed him in the rear of his cruiser.  Officer
Nicolle was engaged in arresting Calvin Lynn, the driver of the red truck for
dangerous operation of a motor vehicle and taking statements from witnesses at the
scene, particularly Cindy and Wendy Grenier.
[11]          
At this point, Officers Nicolle and Posteraro
were engaged in continuing their investigation by taking statements from
various witnesses at the scene.  Within minutes of Harrison Knox being placed in
the rear of Posteraro’s police cruiser, Daniel Knox and Sherry Cole arrived at
the Esso gas station parking lot.  At the time of their arrival, arrests had
been made, individuals had been taken into custody, and the situation was under
control.  Daniel Knox exited the driver’s side of the truck, and Sherry Cole
exited the passenger side of the truck.  Then all hell broke loose.
[12]          
All three plaintiffs testified.  At the time the
trial commenced in 2022, Daniel Knox was 66 years of age.  He was a widower for
nine years by that point and the father of three children, Michael Cole, Sherry
Cole, and Harrison Knox.  Daniel Knox acknowledged in his evidence that the
death of his wife on December 17, 3023 “had a significant impact on him” and it
was apparent that at the time he gave his evidence he was still suffering adversely
from her death.
[13]          
It was the evidence of Daniel Knox that he was
sitting at home on June 11, 2014 when he received a call from Harrison Knox that
he was blocked in at the Esso parking lot and that he could not go to work. 
Daniel Knox testified that Harrison told him that he’d better get there before
he hammered someone.  Subsequent to this call, Daniel Knox received a call from
his grandson who told him that Harrison was arrested and was in the back of a police
cruiser.  Dan Knox testified that he called the Ontario Provincial Police “to
get someone over there to straighten out the situation”.  Daniel Knox decided
to go to the scene.  He understood that the police were on the scene and that
his attendance at the scene was not required.  Daniel Knox also acknowledged in
his evidence that while he was travelling to the scene, he was advised by the
Ontario Provincial Police to pull over and that he ignored those instructions
and did not pull over.  His explanation for not doing so was “my crew and
family needed help”.  His intention was “to  take care of business”, to get his
truck on the road and his crew back to work.  Daniel Knox testified that he asked
Sherry to call the OPP while they were enroute “to see if the OPP were taking
care of things”.  Daniel Knox testified that when he entered the Esso station
parking lot, he pulled next to a police car.  He saw his son Harrison motioning
him to the police car, so he went over to the car and opened the door to see
what Harrison wanted.  It was the evidence of  Daniel Knox that when he opened the
police cruiser door, he understood that Harrison was in custody.  Harrison was
handcuffed behind his back.  As soon as he opened the police cruiser door,
Daniel Knox heard an officer say to get  away from the cruiser, so he walked
toward the officer.  Daniel Knox testified that as soon as he got close to the
officer he was told to get on the ground, that he was under arrest, and that
Officer Nicolle grabbed his bicep and that he pulled his arm back.  Daniel
testified that he did not know why he would be under arrest.  As he put it in
his evidence, “I am thinking for what – I didn’t do anything.  I’m minding my
own business.”  Daniel Knox testified that at this point he sees officer
Posteraro and that Posteraro has his taser out and tells him to get on the ground
and has his taser pointed at him.
[14]          
The aforementioned interaction between Daniel
Knox, Officer Nicolle and Officer Posteraro are not captured on video.  A portion
of their subsequent interaction is captured on video.  This video is contained
in the joint document brief, Book 1, Tab 4, and was entered as Exhibit 2 at the
trial.  The video is one minute and nine seconds in duration.  In the video the
police keep telling Daniel Knox to get on the ground, that he is under arrest. 
Daniel Knox keeps walking around.  The video shows Sherry Cole telling her father
to get on the ground.  Daniel Knox testified that he was not getting on the
ground because he did nothing wrong.  One video depicts Dan Knox going to the
front of the red truck.  One of the officers says, “you are not getting out of
here”.  Officer Posteraro tries to grab Mr. Knox’s right arm.  Mr. Knox pulls
away from him.  It was the evidence of Daniel Knox that he pulled away from
Officer Posteraro because “I didn’t believe he had any right grabbing me”.  It was
also the evidence of Daniel Knox that he “understood that the police were
trying to arrest me”.
[15]          
Daniel Knox testified that he was not trying to
escape; that he was just trying to get the police officers to talk to him.  At this
point Officer Posteraro deploys his taser, twice.  Once initially, and once
again when Daniel Knox was trying to get up on his feet.  The interaction directly
before the taser being deployed and at the time the taser was deployed is
captured on the video.
[16]          
Daniel Knox describes the effect of being
tasered like being electrocuted.  He described pain and “a continuous jolt of
electricity going through my body”.  Mr. Knox described the police “piling on
top of me” and being very rough.  Mr. Knox described himself as “calm the whole
time”.  As he put it in his evidence, “I knew not to aggravate these fellows”.
[17]          
After being tasered, Daniel Knox describes standing
up and being walked to the police cruiser with Officer Bruni “kicking the heck
out of me” in his Achilles heel area. It was the evidence of Daniel Knox that
he was kicked from behind “15 to 20 times” and that he got into the police
cruiser on his knees.  Daniel Knox described these actions of the police
officers in the face of him being “quite compliant”.
[18]          
It was the evidence of Daniel Knox that from his
vantage point he could see the arrest of his daughter Sherry Cole taking place. 
The evidence of Daniel Knox was that Officer Van Den Diepstraten slammed Sherry
Cole over the hood of the police cruiser and was choking her with her sweater twisted
around her neck.  Mr. Knox’s view was that Sherry was getting “beat up” by this
police officer.  Officer Van Den Diepstraten continued to choke Sherry and also
kneed her in the back.  Mr. Knox testified that Sherry was trying to fight the officer
off and was kicking her leg back in an attempt to get the officer off of her.  Eventually
other officers assisted, including Officer Posteraro, and Sherry Cole was handcuffed
and placed in the back of Van Den Diepstraten’s police cruiser.  It was the evidence
of Daniel Knox that when this was accomplished, the officers patted each other
on the back and gave each other “high 5’s” in celebration.
[19]          
Daniel Knox testified that eventually he was
brought to the Ontario Provincial Police Station with a comment by Officer
Bruni that “I thought lumberjacks were supposed to be tough”.  Mr. Knox remained
at the police station before being released three to four hours later.  Daniel
Knox was charged in an Information with three counts of resisting arrest, two
relating to Officer Posteraro and one relating to Officer Nicolle, and two
counts of assault, one relating to Officer Nicolle and one relating to Officer
Posteraro (Exhibit 4).  The Crown sought a fine of $1,500 in their initial
screening form (Exhibit 5).  Ultimately, the charges against Daniel Knox were
withdrawn in exchange for a donation to the Alzheimer’s Society in the amount
of $300, received on October 21, 2014.  It was the position of Daniel Knox that
he did nothing illegal, and the donation was made without his consent or
instructions by his counsel, Donald Orazietti, K.C.  It was the evidence of
Daniel Knox that when he found out that Mr. Orazietti had negotiated a withdrawal
of the charges in exchange for a donation that he fired him and wanted to take
the matter to court.
[20]          
In cross-examination, Daniel Knox admitted that
he knew that Harrison was in police custody when he went to the police cruiser and
opened the door.  Mr. Knox disagreed with the suggestion that by opening the door
he made it possible for Harrison Knox to get out of the police cruiser.  Mr.
Knox is 6-foot-2 and weighs 250 pounds.  He is admittedly bigger than any of the
police officers he was involved with on June 11, 2014.   In cross-examination,
Daniel Knox was adamant that he did not push Officer Nicolle.  His evidence was
that he only pulled his arm away.  In the video, the hand of Daniel Knox is
shown to be closed and raised above his head.  Mr. Knox testified that this is
when he was pulling his hand back.  Mr. Knox acknowledged that he was told by
the police officers several times to get on the ground, but he remained upright
and moving around. Mr. Knox acknowledged that his daughter Sherry Cole urged
him to get on the ground but that he ignored those instructions from his
daughter.  It was the evidence of Daniel Knox that when Officer Posteraro tried
to grab his wrist that “I pulled away from him”.
[21]          
It was the evidence of Daniel Knox that when he
opened the police cruiser of Posteraro for his son, Harrison Knox, that there
was a “blast of heat like a blast furnace that he felt”.   A report with
respect to the weather on June 11, 2014 from Environment Canada (Exhibit 17)
was put to Mr. Knox by the defendants’ counsel.  This report indicated that it
was 16 degrees Celsius at 12:00 noon that day, and 18 degrees Celsius at 2:00
p.m. on that date.  Mr. Knox continued with his assertion that there was a
blast of heat from the car in which Harrison Knox was lodged.
[22]          
Daniel Knox indicated in cross-examination that
he sought no medical treatment with respect to the kicks to his leg by the
police officers and had no explanation as to why he sustained no bruising to
his leg or ankle area as a result of these 15 to 20 hard kicks by the officers.
[23]          
As to the donation that was made with respect to
the criminal charges laid against him, it was the evidence of Daniel Knox in
cross-examination that when he made the donation, he understood that all the
charges would be dropped and that was a factor in making the donation.
[24]          
Harrison Knox testified that he has worked for
Tree Men & A Chainsaw on a fulltime basis since 2007, and at the time of the
incident he was the crew leader.  It was the evidence of Harrison Knox that on
June 11, 2014, he was driving north on Highway 17 from Sault Ste. Marie with
the intentions of dropping the dump box truck at the abandoned Esso gas station
at the Searchmont turnoff and then heading to Island Lake to do a scheduled
job.  Harrison’s vehicle was ahead of the other company vehicle, the red truck,
and his vehicle arrived at the Esso lot first.  The Grenier vehicle arrived and
pinned his vehicle in.  It was the evidence of Harrison that the Grenier women
were screaming at him and calling him a “goof” to which Harrison replied, “let’s
go – move your fucking truck”.
[25]          
Harrison Knox admitted that he had an
altercation with John Vanderloo Sr., but Harrison describes this as an attempt
to push Vanderloo away from him.  It was the evidence of Harrison Knox that
Vanderloo put his arms out to grab him and that he responded by grabbing
Vanderloo underneath his arm pits to push him away. It was the position of
Harrison Knox that the bruising to Vanderloo depicted in the photographs in
Exhibit 20 “was bruising and scratching from me holding him away”.
[26]          
Harrison Knox acknowledged in his evidence that
he telephoned his father, Daniel Knox, and told him that he’d “better get there
quick before I hammer someone”.  After the altercation with Vanderloo and after
his vehicle was struck and the tire blown, he sat on the chipper vehicle and
waited for the police to arrive.  After the police arrived, the officer spoke
to Vanderloo Sr. and to one of the Grenier women.  After that, an officer came
to him and told him that he was under arrest for dangerous driving.  He replied
that he was not driving the truck on the highway.  Another officer returned and
told Harrison that he was under arrest for assault.  Harrison was then handcuffed
and brought to the police cruiser.
[27]          
Harrison Knox described the handcuffs as being
really tight and high on his wrist, above the bone on his wrist.  He remembers
being “anxious and distraught” while in the police cruiser.  It was also
Harrison’s recollection that it was hot in the police cruiser and was warm
enough to sweat without exertion.  It was the evidence of Harrison Knox that
all of his happened around 1:00 p.m.  Although Exhibit 17 (the Environment Canada
report) indicates that it was 18.2 degrees Celsius at 1:00 p.m., Harrison
indicated in his evidence that “it seemed warmer to me”.
[28]          
It was the evidence of Harrison Knox that he was
in the police cruiser for approximately 20 to 25 minutes before his father,
Daniel Knox, arrived at the scene.  Harrison tried to get his father’s
attention as soon as he got out of the truck.  His father opened the cruiser door
and Harrison swung his legs out of the cruiser.  It was at this point that Harrison
heard Officer Nicolle say to “get away from the fucking car” and “get on the
fucking ground” to his father.   Harrison Knox testified that Officer Nicolle
grabbed Daniel Knox by the arm, by the bicep, and that Dan pulled his arm
back.  When Daniel Knox was told to get on the ground, he replied “what for”
according to the evidence of Harrison Knox.  Harrison Knox was adamant in his evidence
that Daniel Knox did not push Officer Nicole.  Harrison Knox describes the
officers as “beating on my father” and testified that he was concerned for his
father’s safety because he saw “how badly they were beating on my father”.
[29]          
Harrison Knox recalls someone telling him to get
back into the police cruiser and he complied.  Harrison Knox recalls his father
being tasered, Officer Bruni kicking his father in the back of the legs, and
stomping the back of his father’s ankles.  This all occurred while Daniel Knox
was not resisting the officers.  Harrison Knox describes Sherry Cole as “screaming
and distraught”.
[30]          
It was the evidence of Harrison Knox that his
sister Sherry Cole was being “roughhoused” by police officers.  He described
her being “slammed” over the hood of a vehicle and being pushed and held with a
knee to her back.  He described Sherry Cole’s response and one of struggling with
the police officers and screaming at them “what the fuck are you doing”.
[31]          
Harrison Knox testified that he was taken to the
Ontario Provincial Police station by Officer Posteraro.  He was charged with
assault and dangerous operation of a motor vehicle and released on a promise to
appear (Exhibit 22).  The charges were ultimately resolved on October 20, 2014
by Harrison Knox entering into a peace bond not to go near John Vanderloo Sr.
and John Vanderloo Jr.  In his evidence, Harrison Knox indicated that he was in
full agreement with the disposition of the criminal charges against him by a
peace bond.  He testified that “I thought they were excellent terms” and that “it
seemed like a good choice for me”.  In response to the question put to him in
examination in-chief as to why he did not go to trial, Harrison Knox replied
that “I just wanted to get it over with.  It caused me stress.  I wanted my
guns back.  I didn’t want to go to court and get wrongfully convicted and have
the judge believe the police who I knew were liars”.  Harrison Knox indicated in
his evidence that he didn’t understand that by agreeing to a peace bond would
prevent him from bringing a civil action.
[32]          
In cross-examination, Harrison Knox acknowledged
that he was in court when the peace bond was entered into.  Harrison Knox
acknowledged that it was Calvin Lynn who was driving the red truck.  In
cross-examination, Harrison testified that Officer Nicolle spoke to him about
driving but did not indicate that he was under arrest for driving the vehicle,
just under arrest for assault.  Harrison Knox disagreed with the suggestion put
to him in cross-examination that Posteraro’s vehicle was running while he was
in it.  Harrison Knox admitted in cross-examination that he never sought
medical treatment for heat exposure and that he didn’t complain about the
handcuffs on his wrists when they were applied.  It was the evidence of
Harrison Knox that the pain in his right wrist was ‘excruciating” due to the
handcuffs being improperly applied, but admitted that he didn’t immediately see
a physician, didn’t go to the emergency department, and didn’t miss any work
with respect to his right wrist.
[33]          
Sherry Cole testified that at the time of the
June 11, 2014 incident she was 45 years of age, on a disability survivor’s
pension, and was working on and off at her father’s business as well as
operating a dog grooming business on her own.  It was the evidence of Sherry
Cole that her brother Harrison called her father twice indicating that the
company vehicle was blocked in, rammed, and that a tire was blown.  Sherry
testified that her father telephoned the OPP and that she made a call to the OPP
when she was in her father’s vehicle on Great Northern Road in Sault Ste. Marie. 
Sherry was advised by the Ontario Provincial Police dispatcher to pull over.  It
was the evidence of Sherry Cole that she thought that she was instructed to
pull over because she was on the phone and not instructed to pull the vehicle
over so not as to attend the scene.  While on Great Northern Road, Sherry
received a telephone call from her son Daniel Campbell who advised that
Harrison was arrested and placed in a police cruiser.  With all this
information, Sherry Cole and her father Daniel Knox travelled to the vacant
Esso gas station lot at the Searchmont turnoff on Highway 17 North.
[34]          
Sherry Cole testified that when they arrived at the
lot, her father went to the police cruiser, and she heard a police officer yell
to him to get away from the cruiser and get down on the ground.   Her father
continued to walk toward the police officer Nicolle who tried to grab her
father’s arm, causing her father to pull his arm back.   Sherry Cole testified
that Daniel Knox did not push Officer Nicolle.  She testified that she
was threatened with the taser.  Her father’s response to being told to get on the
ground was “I’m not getting on the ground.  I am not a dog.”  Sherry Cole
testified that events unfolded rapidly.  As she put it, “it all happened quickly”.
[35]          
Sherry Cole confirmed in her evidence that she
told her father to get on the ground because she felt the police officers were going
to taser him.  She testified that she ignored the directions from the police
officers to step back because she was worried about her father.  As Sherry Cole
put it in her evidence, “I was very confused as to what was going on”.  Ms.
Cole denied that her father cocked his fist toward Officer Posteraro.  It was
her evidence that Posteraro grabbed her father’s right arm, and that Daniel Knox
pulled his arm away, much like he did with Officer Nicolle.  Sherry Cole testified
that her father did not push either Officer Nicolle or Officer Posteraro. 
Sherry Cole did acknowledge in her evidence that she pushed Officer Posteraro
after he tasered Daniel Knox.  Sherry Cole testified “it was just instinct to
help him”.
[36]          
Sherry Cole testified that after the video
ended, Daniel Knox is walked to the police cruiser with an officer on each arm
and an officer behind him, kicking him in the back of the legs.  Ms. Cole was
unsure as to how many kicks to the leg there were but believes that it was more
than two or three times, without her father resisting in any way.  Sherry Cole
describes herself as being pretty angry and upset at that point and is “sure
that I was very loud”.  Once Daniel Knox was in the cruiser, Sherry Cole was walking
toward his truck at which point another police officer (Constable Peter Van Den
Diepstraten) came “flying in from the highway, exited his vehicle and karate
kicked the door shut”.  Ms. Cole was told she was being arrested.  As Ms. Cole
indicated in her evidence, “now I was angry”.  Sherry Cole testified that at
that point in time, Officer Van Den Diepstraten threw her on the hood of the
vehicle with his knee and forearm on her back and twisting her shirt causing
her to choke.  Sherry Cole testified that “I felt violated” and her response was
to kick out her back leg in an attempt to kick the police officers off of her. 
Handcuffs were “aggressively put on her” according to Sherry Cole.  She was placed
in the police vehicle and transported to the Ontario Provincial Police
detachment.
[37]          
Ultimately, Sherry Cole was released from the
police station on a promise to appear on a charge of obstructing a police
officer, with an additional charge of assault being laid according to a
replacement Information (Exhibit 41).  As to the disposition of the charges and
how that occurred, it was the evidence of Sherry Cole that it was her father,
Daniel Knox, who “was the one making all the decisions” and giving the orders
to the lawyer.  The charges against Sherry Cole were withdrawn in exchange for
her making a donation in the amount of $10.00 to the CNIB.  Ms. Cole testified
that she did not ask anyone or instruct anyone to make a donation on her behalf
and that she doesn’t “remember if I knew it was happening at the time”.
[38]          
In cross-examination, Sherry Cole was examined
about the suggestion that she thought she was asked to pull over  by the OPP
dispatcher because she was on a cellphone.  She acknowledged and admitted in
cross-examination that she was told to ask her father to pull over and stop and
that she herself asked her father to pull over and stop.  In cross-examination,
Sherry Cole testified that Officer Nicolle never told her father that he was
under arrest for obstruct and that she did not hear Officer Nicolle tell her
father that he was under arrest for assault.  In cross-examination, Sherry Cole
acknowledged that the taser was never pointed at her and when the taser was
fired at her father, she started to yell at the police officers, calling them “cocksuckers”
and that she shoved Officer Posteraro “to prevent him from tasering a second
time”.
[39]          
In cross-examination, Sherry Cole admitted to
intending on leaving the scene as the fourth officer (Officer Van Den
Diepstraten) arrived on the scene and arrested her.  She testified that no
police officer told her that she was under arrest, which was different to her
evidence on examination for discovery on September 26, 2017 when she testified
that she didn’t remember being told that she was under arrest.
[40]          
It was the evidence of Sherry Cole that the lawyer,
Donald Orazietti, K.C., acted without instructions in disposing of the charges
against her.  Sherry Cole acknowledged in cross-examination that no complaint
was made against Mr. Orazietti to the Law Society of Ontario.  As Ms. Cole put
it in her evidence, “I left it entirely to my dad”.
[41]          
The plaintiffs called Steven Summerville as an
expert witness.  Without objecting by the defendants, Mr. Summerville was qualified
as an expert to provide opinion evidence in the following areas:
[42]          
Mr. Summerville has been qualified to testify as
an expert 30 times in previous proceedings.  He produced a 79-page curriculum vitae
outlining his background as a police officer for just shy of 20 years, and
since August 2021 in the private sector involved in security and training.  Mr.
Summerville indicated in his evidence that he has been retained by both police
services boards and individual plaintiffs on a roughly equal basis and that he
operates without an agenda.
[43]          
Mr. Summerville produced a report in this matter
found at Book 3, Tab 2 of the book of documents.  Mr. Summerville, in his
evidence, described the use of force model (Exhibit 42).  As testified to by
Mr. Summerville, most people are cooperative and voluntarily comply with police
authorities thereby negating the need to use force.  Mr. Summerville stressed
that the Ontario use of force model is a guide for officers, it is not
legislated.  The officers themselves must assess the situation and select the
most reasonable option.
[44]          
In the Ontario use of force model, “passive
resistance” is a challenge to authority with no physicality to it.  “Active
resistance” is a pushing or pulling back or walking away or walking toward a
police officer.  “Assaultive” behaviour involves actions or gestures that would
lead to a belief in the officers that they were physically assaulted.  “Serious
bodily harm or death” is a serious threat to someone’s safety.
[45]          
In his report, Mr. Summerville indicated that taser
use by police had to be done cautiously and the question as to whether there
were more reasonable options available must be considered.  Officers are taught
to attempt to communicate with an individual, attempting to “talk them down”.  In
 Mr. Summerville’s view, Constable Nicolle failed to do that in his interactions
with Daniel Knox.  Mr. Summerville felt that Officer Nicolle didn’t develop a
rapport with Daniel Knox or try to solicit compliance from him in his dealings
with him.
[46]          
Mr. Summerville testified that it was appropriate
to use a taser when a person displays a range of assaultive behaviour or active
resistant behaviour.  In the short video (Exhibit 2) played for Mr.
Summerville, he indicated that it was his opinion that Daniel Knox displayed
passive or active resistant behaviour but not assaultive behaviour.  It was Mr.
Summerville’s opinion that nothing in the brief video shows the officers were
trying to de-escalate the situation.  Mr. Summerville indicated that even with
what he saw in the video, there was still an opportunity for the police officers
to build a rapport with Daniel Knox and attempt to de-escalate the situation but
they failed to do so.  Mr. Summerville also indicated in his evidence that
repeating the same commands over and over again is not helpful and is not
consistent with police training or practice.  Mr. Summerville described repeating
nine times for someone to go down on the ground is “not helpful”.  In the
video, Mr. Summerville does not see a cocked fist by Daniel Knox.  What he does
see his Mr. Knox pulling his hand back, but this is not a threat to the police
officers.
[47]          
Mr. Summerville agreed with the question put to
him by the court as to whether Mr. Knox’s non-compliance a sign of active
resistance.  Mr. Summerville indicated that it was.  Gain, Mr. Summerville was
of the opinion that it was the police officer’s approach in telling Daniel Knox
to “calm down” and repeating the same commands to him over and over again that
triggered an escalated response by Mr. Knox.  Mr. Summerville was of the
opinion that if the police officers had employed proper de-escalation
techniques that the situation would not have escalated to the point it did.
[48]          
As to the force employed by the police to get
Daniel Knox into the police vehicle, Mr. Summerville indicated that if you
accept that Daniel Knox was pulling away, the use of shin rakes (the heel of
the foot rubbing or pushing into the shin to cause pain and lessen the resistance)
is in accordance with police procedure.  Mr. Summerville testified that prior
to using a shin rake, the person should be told that force will be used if you
do not get into the vehicle.
[49]          
During his evidence in examination in-chief, the
court asked Mr. Summerville about his opinion if the court finds as a fact that
Daniel Knox pushed Officer Nicolle.  Mr. Summerville indicated in response that
if the court accepted that a police officer had been assaulted then the officer
can take reasonable steps to place the person under arrest.  Mr. Summerville
testified that any time an officer is assaulted there is reasonable cause to
place that person under arrest.  As to the use of the taser, Mr. Summerville
indicated that if the court accepts active resistance was engaged then the use
of the taser by police was appropriate.  The exact exchange the court and Mr.
Summerville is indicated below:
[50]          
With respect to Harrison Knox, Mr. Summerville
testified that if handcuffs are applied property as to location and tightness that
you would not expect damage to the wrist to occur (the evidence of Dr. Darren
Costain, which I will refer to later in my judgment, was that the damage that
Harrison Knox is complaining about to his wrist could not have been caused by
the handcuffs).
[51]          
As to the police vehicle that Harrison Knox was
placed in, Mr. Summerville’s opinion is that it should have been locked and running. 
Mr. Summerville described reasonable police officer conduct as (a) locking the
vehicle; (b) parking in the shade or running the vehicle with air conditioning;
and (c) frequent checks on the prisoner’s welfare.
[52]          
In cross-examination, Mr. Summerville agreed
with the suggestion that when it comes to the use of force that everything is
contextual and in the perception of the police officer.  Mr. Summerville agreed
that there is a range of reasonable responses to any situation.  Mr.
Summerville agreed that once a person was lawfully arrested that it was the duty
of the officer to take that person into custody and that a person lawfully
placed under arrest would not be allowed to walk away.
[53]          
Mr. Summerville testified that on the video Daniel
Knox exhibited signs consistent with a person in crisis, as indicated by waving
his arms around, his body language and mannerisms, his walking away, his
placing his hands in his pockets.  In Mr. Summerville’s mind, it is evidence that
Daniel Knox was upset.  Mr. Summerville made it clear in his evidence that he
is not suggesting that Daniel  Knox was in crisis but rather that he exhibited
signs consistent with a person in crisis.
[54]          
With respect to Sherry Cole, Mr. Summerville
agreed that if she shoved Officer Posteraro then this is assaultive behaviour
in the use of force model creating reasonable grounds to exercise an arrest. 
When Sherry Cole was trying to kick the officer that was arresting her this is
also assaultive behaviour in the use of force model.  Mr. Summerville agreed
with the suggestion that after an assault has taken place, verbal engagements
are less likely to be effective.  Mr. Summerville also agreed with the
suggestion put to him in cross-examination that walking away from the police
makes it more difficult to have communication.
[55]          
Mr. Summerville disagreed with the suggestion put
to him in cross-examination that Daniel Knox was given a lot of chances to
submit to a peaceful arrest.  It was Mr. Summerville’s view that telling a
person to calm down is not respectful.  It is disrespectful and it serves to
escalate the situation.  Mr. Summerville’s opinion was that nothing justified
Daniel Knox being grounded by the police.  Grounding is only justified when a
person displays active resistant behaviour.
[56]          
Mr. Summerville admitted in cross-examination
that he never received training on the use of a taser.  The taser came into use
after he retired from the police force.  Mr. Summerville cannot dispute the opinion
of Chris Lawrence (the expert of the defendants on the use of force) that a
taser is considerably safer than a baton or control techniques.  Mr. Summerville
testified that he saw nothing in the video that would suggest to him that Daniel
Knox was attempting to get into the driver’s side of his vehicle.  Mr.
Summerville also testified that if the court accepts the officer’s evidence that
he perceived  Daniel Knox to be attempting to get into his vehicle, then there would
be an imminent need to control him by the police officers.
[57]          
Mr. Summerville agreed with the suggestion put
to him in cross-examination that Daniel Knox is attempting to stand up when the
second taser is applied by the officer.  Mr. Summerville also agreed with the
suggestion that double locking handcuffs is standard police procedure so that
they cannot be put on too tight.  Mr. Summerville indicated in his evidence that
he would be surprised if police officers were not trained to lock cruiser doors
and as a practice they don’t do it.  Mr. Summerville testified that due
diligence and standard of care is to secure the prisoner and prudent practice
is to lock the door.  This is what Mr. Summerville teaches in the training he
provides.
[58]          
Mr. Summerville was called by the plaintiffs as
their sole witness in reply.  In his reply evidence, Mr. Summerville testified that
time is needed to be able to de-escalate and allow a person to respond. 
De-escalation can’t be accomplished in a few seconds or even in a minute.  On the
facts of our case, it took a very limited amount of time to try to
de-escalate.  A minute or seconds is not sufficient to attempt to de-escalate.
[59]          
Cindy Grenier was the first witness called by
the defendants.  She was following the red truck that veered into oncoming
traffic on Highway 17 North, and she pulled into the vacant Esso lot at the
Searchmont turnoff following the red truck and the other vehicle owned by the
plaintiff Daniel Knox.  Ms. Grenier testified that she pulled in front of the
red truck intending to get his licence plate number to call in to the police as
she thought the driver might be under the influence of alcohol.  She continued
to block in the vehicle with her vehicle because she didn’t want them leaving
until the police got there.  She observed four people get out of the red truck
and walk toward the father and son (the Vanderloos).  She believed that there
was going to be a confrontation, so she got back into her truck.  She never
observed a confrontation take place.  She observed the original driver of the
red truck being arrested by the first officer who arrived who also wanted to
get a statement from her mother.  Other officers were arriving at the scene.
[60]          
Cindy Grenier testified that at that point,
Daniel Knox and Sherry Cole “flew in”.  Ms. Grenier described them as being “very
agitated and angry”.  She observed Daniel Knox go up to the police cruiser and
open the door.  Officer Nicolle told Knox that he could not do that and told
him to stop.  At that point, Daniel Knox and Officer Nicolle were walking toward
each other.  Ms. Grenier described  that Daniel Knox was ranting and raving. 
Grenier testified that there was “lots of agitation and anger” from Daniel Knox
at the time he got to Officer Nicolle.  Daniel Knox and Officer Nicolle met,
and Mr. Knox pushed Officer Nicolle, a shove toward his chest area.  Ms.
Grenier testified that “when they came together, Mr. Knox pushed the officer –
a push, like a shove in the chest area”.  Ms. Grenier was asked if it is
possible that Mr. Knox only pulled away from the officer and did not push him,
that it was a pull rather than a push to which Cindy Grenier replied, “A pull,
no.  No, it was a push.”  At that point everyone started to come around. 
Daniel Knox was agitated and angry.  Sherry Cole was verbal and upset and
angry.  At that point, Ms. Grenier describes there being “a big scuffle over there”.
[61]          
Cindy Grenier testified that she never saw the
taser being applied to Daniel Knox.  All she saw is Mr. Knox going down and
trying to get back up.  She recalls Daniel Knox being put into the police
cruiser by the officers.  She described it “as a struggle” and that it looked
like “he was trying to fight getting in there.  He was trying not to get into
the car.”  She never saw Daniel Knox being kicked in the leg by the police
officers.
[62]          
As to Sherry Cole, Ms. Grenier testified that “I
had no idea what she was doing.”  She described that there was a lot of commotion
going on and that she didn’t remember the full details as to what Sherry Cole was
up to.  Cindy Grenier did recall a police officer trying to put handcuffs on
Sherry Cole who resisted this and resisted being placed into the police
cruiser.  She described an officer having Ms. Cole’s arms and that she was
struggling.  Ms. Cole’s phone fell onto the hood of the vehicle and onto the
ground and a police officer stepped on it with Ms. Grenier indicating in her evidence
that there was nothing to lead her to believe that that was done on purpose.  Ultimately,
Ms. Grenier was allowed to go home and later attended at the police station to
give a statement.
[63]          
In cross-examination, Ms. Grenier was candid
about having a difficult time remembering the details of the events and remembering
the order of how things unfolded.  In reading her statement to the police, Ms.
Grenier acknowledged that events as she recalled in her statement were not in
the right sequence.  In her statement, she described the taser and  after that,
the push.  Ms. Grenier testified “that’s not what happened.  I clearly messed up.” 
 Ms. Grenier described herself as very nervous when the statement was taken. 
Ms. Grenier was aggressively and effectively cross-examined on this point by
counsel for the plaintiffs.  It was clear that her statement did not reflect
the sequence of events as they unfolded on June 11, 2014.  Despite this
cross-examination, Cindy Grenier was adamant that “everything I said in the
statement was correct, it was just in the wrong order”.
[64]          
Arrangements were made for Cindy Grenier to talk
to counsel for the plaintiffs prior to trial.  She did talk to counsel for the
defendants, but in the end did not speak to counsel for the plaintiff.  Ms.
Grenier testified that “I didn’t know if it was the right thing to do, so I changed
my mind.  I was just scared of talking to you.”  Cindy Grenier denied the
suggestion put to her by plaintiffs’ counsel that she wanted to help the
defendants but was not interested in helping the plaintiffs.
[65]          
In cross-examination, Ms. Grenier admitted that
blocking the vehicle in was all her idea.  She indicated that she “was very
upset.  There was a bad pass.  We all could have been killed.”  On reflection,
Ms. Grenier acknowledged that blocking the truck was probably not a good idea
and “probably” led to the physical altercation between the drivers of the two
vehicles.
[66]          
Although she did not describe it that way in her
statement, at trial, Cindy Grenier indicated that the push to Officer Nicolle
by Daniel Knox happened before he was tasered.  Ms. Grenier acknowledged that
in part of her statement to police things were out of order.  Ms. Grenier
testified that “I missed that up.  I know I did.”  Regardless of the sequence
of events, Ms. Grenier remained consistent both in her statement and in her
evidence at the trial that the “officer went towards him, and he shoved the officer”,
referring to Officer Nicolle and Daniel  Knox.
[67]          
In cross-examination, Cindy Grenier was
continually pressed on her statement being at odds with her evidence at trial. 
In response, Ms. Grenier acknowledged and agreed that her statement is
different than her evidence at trial, adding “the version I remember today is
correct.”  Ms. Grenier added in response that everything in her statement
happened, but may not be in the proper order.  As testified, “everything was so
fast”.
[68]          
Ontario Provincial Police Constable Keith
Nicolle was first on the scene at the vacant Esso lot on June 11, 2014.  He testified
that at 12:53 p.m. on that day he was made aware of a traffic incident with a
truck driving aggressively and passing a black SUV with an oncoming car having
to go onto the gravel to prevent a collision.  Officer Posteraro arrived
shortly after Office Nicolle.  Posteraro started to speak to the occupants of
the black SUV (the Vanderloos) and Nicolle began taking a statement from the
person who called in the incident to the OPP, Wendy Grenier.  Nicolle observed
Posteraro arrest Harrison Knox.  Nicolle testified that he was advised by the dispatcher
that the owner of the company vehicles was travelling to the scene and that he
was upset.  Nicolle observed Daniel Knox and Sherry Cole arrive on the scene.  The
driver, Daniel Knox, went to the Posteraro vehicle where Harrison Knox was
lodged and opened the cruiser door.  Nicolle yelled at Knox to get away from the
vehicle.
[69]          
It was the evidence of Keith Nicolle that after
he yelled at  Daniel Knox to get away from the vehicle, he started to walk
toward him.  According to Nicolle, Knox said “don’t tell me what to fucking do,
my family is under arrest and there’s been accidents”.  Nicolle testified that
at that point, he walked toward Knox and told him to calm down, that they were
conducting an investigation and that he needed to go back to his truck so the
investigation could continue.  Knox replied, “don’t tell me what to fucking do”. 
It was the evidence of Nicolle that he realized at that point in time Daniel
Knox was not going to let the police continue their investigation, “so, I placed
him under arrest.  I told him he was under arrest for obstructing police. I reached
out with my right hand to take physical control of him and then he pushed me
back and told me that he wasn’t under arrest.”
[70]          
The video (Exhibit 2) was shown to Officer
Nicolle who went through the sequence of events in the video in his evidence. 
Nicolle was repeatedly telling Daniel Knox to get on the ground.  Nicolle
testified that it appeared to him that Daniel Knox might leave the scene when
he was at his vehicle and that this was too much of a risk.  As to Posteraro
tasering Dan Knox, it was Officer Nicolle’s view that it was obvious from what
is seen in the video that the police were not going to be able to take control
of Knox without the use of the taser.  Officer Nicolle described it as a “chaotic
situation”.
[71]          
It was the evidence of Officer Nicolle that
after being tasered and when he was back up on his feet that Daniel Knox
resisted going into the police cruiser.  He stiffened his body and literally
had to be pushed in the vehicle.  It was the evidence of Officer Nicolle that
he did not witness anyone kicking Daniel Knox in the back of the legs.  While
this commotion was ongoing, Nicolle observed that Harrison Knox was still
outside the police cruiser.  Nicolle told Harrison to go back into the cruiser
and he complied.
[72]          
As to Sherry Cole, it was the evidence of Officer
Nicolle that she was screaming, yelling and swearing at the police officers.  She
was instructed by police to stop or back away from them, or she would be
arrested for obstruction.  Cole did not comply.  Officer Nicolle and Officer
Van Den Diepstraten placed Sherry Cole under arrest for obstruction.  It was
the evidence of Officer Nicolle that Sherry Cole resisted being arrested.  Cole
was put up against a police cruiser.  Officer Nicolle testified that he did not
kick or knee Cole.  Nicolle testified that he did not see Officer Van Den
Diepstraten strike Sherry Cole.  Officer Nicolle described a “soft hand
technique” being used to take physical control of Sherry Cole.  Ultimately,
Sherry Cole was placed in the police cruiser and transported to the OPP detachment.
[73]          
When asked about attempts at de-escalation in
examination in-chief, Officer Nicolle testified that Daniel Knox was upset from
the beginning and that he was trying to calm him down and get him to go into
his vehicle so the investigation could continue.  Officer Nicolle testified
that if Dan Knox had got on the ground as instructed, there would have been no
need to use force on him.   It was Officer Nicolle’s evidence that he believed
that the use of the taser was the safest option for Daniel Knox who was upset, “not
in crisis”.
[74]          
Officer Nicolle testified that police cruisers
lock from the inside automatically so that there is no need to lock them on the
outside.  He has never received training or instructions to lock a police cruiser
from the outside.
[75]          
Officer Keith Nicolle was subject to a lengthy
and vigorous cross-examination.  It started by Nicolle being referred to his
notes in which he indicated that Dan Knox had pushed Officer Posteraro.  The
video (Exhibit 2) shows otherwise.  Officer Nicolle was clearly wrong about
this.  The “will say” prepared by Officer Nicolle is also at odds with this.  His
“will say” states that “male pulled away from Posteraro”.  Officer Nicolle
agreed that there is a significant difference from his notes and his will say
statement.  Nicolle admitted that in the video you can see Dan Knox pull away
from Posteraro and not push him.  Officer Nicolle could not provide a
satisfactory explanation to the court as to why the difference in his notes and
will say exist and why he was in error about Dan Knox pushing Officer
Posteraro.  Nicolle testified that it might have been “a clerical error”. 
Nicolle stated  that “What I believed to be true at the time until I reviewed
the video.  The video is clear that what I said was incorrect.”  Officer
Nicolle disagreed with the suggestion that he fabricated the evidence about
Posteraro being pushed by Knox to justify tasering Daniel Knox.
[76]          
The cross-examination of Officer Nicolle also
highlighted the inaccuracy of his evidence about Harrison Knox getting out of
the police cruiser.  On page 38 of Officer Nicolle’s notes, he states that “he
let the prisoner out of the car”, referring to Dan Knox.  At trial, Officer
Nicolle testified that he doesn’t remember if Harrison got out of the vehicle
or not when Dan Knox opened the door.  In the video (Exhibit 2) it can be observed
that Harrison Knox is sitting in the police cruiser and then he gets out of the
vehicle at a later time.   The point is that Harrison Knox did not get out of
the police cruiser immediately upon Dan Knox opening the door to the police
cruiser.
[77]          
It was the evidence of Officer Nicolle that he
was justified in arresting Daniel Knox for obstruct in opening the car door to
the police cruiser.  As Nicolle put it in his evidence, “I could have arrested
him for opening the car door.  It was a criminal offence for Knox to open the car
door.”  Nicolle testified in cross-examination that he would not have arrested
him for just opening the car door, and that “I arrested him for everything.”
[78]          
It was Officer Nicolle’s view that the taser is
an intermediate weapon and that a hands on would have been more of a use of
force because of the possibility of injury.  Officer Nicolle indicated in his
evidence that as events unfolded that “it didn’t take very long to determine
there would be no peaceful resolution to it.”  As to the specifics of the push
on him by Daniel Knox, Officer Nicolle doesn’t remember the specifics of the
push, indicating that “it was nine years ago”.  At page 41 of his notes,
Officer Nicolle has stated that “I reached out and he grabbed my arm and pushed
me back and said I’m not under fucking arrest”.  His notes also indicate that
Officer Posteraro came over at this point with his taser out.  At discovery,
Officer Nicolle testified that Posteraro didn’t come over to him at this point
in time despite the argument.  At trial, Officer Nicolle testified that “maybe”
Officer Posteraro came over, but he wasn’t sure.  Officer Nicolle admitted that
his notes, his discovery, and his evidence at trial “can appear a little
different”.
[79]          
There is also a discrepancy between Officer
Nicolle’s notes and his testimony at trial about the involvement of Sherry
Cole.  In his notes, Officer Nicolle says that Sherry was screaming at the
officers before her father, Dan Knox, was tasered.  At trial, Nicolle indicated
that it was not until Knox was tasered that the screaming by Cole started, but
Nicolle also indicated that he might have been mistaken about this since Sherry
Cole was screaming at them earlier.  Officer Nicolle was unable to
satisfactorily reconcile his evidence that Sherry Cole was trying to intervene
to prevent her father from being arrested while at the same time telling him to
get on the ground.
[80]          
Officer Nicolle agreed with the suggestion put
to him by plaintiffs’ counsel in cross-examination that nowhere in the video
clip (Exhibit 2) can you see Daniel Knox assaulting a police officer.  Nicolle
testified that Dan Knox was walking in the space of a police officer and that
it was aggressive.  Nicolle testified that what “he did was lunge at me”, although
it is difficult to see a lunging toward a police officer from observing the
video.
[81]          
Exhibit 3 is the promise to appear for Daniel Knox
indicating that he is being charged with four counts of assault and one count
of obstruct.  Officer Nicolle acknowledged that this was wrong.  One of the
assault charges is based on the erroneous belief that Knox had pushed
Posteraro.  This was clearly wrong as seen in the video.  As Nicolle put it in his
evidence, “I don’t know what was the thought in my mind”.  Apart from the push
there was a suggestion that Knox also kicked Posteraro, although in the video
you cannot observe Knox kick Posteraro.  Nicolle testified that it was his understanding
that the kick took place during the altercation when Dan Knox was being
tasered.
[82]          
Officer Nicolle testified that he did not apply
shin rakes to Dan Knox.  It was the evidence of Nicolle that Knox was “standing
stiff” and was resisting being placed in the police cruiser.  Nicolle testified
that police cruisers are air conditioned and are generally kept running. 
Nicolle had no recollection about whether his vehicle was running or not, but
indicated that “I do not see myself putting a person in a vehicle that is not
running”.
[83]          
Officer Nicolle had no specific recollection of
who told Sherry Cole she was under arrest, although page 45 of his notes
indicates that “we placed her under arrest”, referring to himself and Officer
Peter Van Den Diepstraten.  Both of them pushed Cole over the front of the vehicle,
Nicolle indicating that she was resisting “slightly”.  It was the evidence of
Officer Nicolle that there were no high-fives after Cole’s arrest or comments
to Daniel Knox.  As Nicolle put it in his evidence, “I took no pleasure in all
of this”.
[84]          
Constable Mario Posteraro has been an OPP
officer since 1999.  At the date of the incident (June 11, 2014), he was fully
trained on the use of the taser.  At 12:50 p.m., Posteraro responded to a call
from Wendy Grenier that there was an aggressive driver and that she was
blocking in the driver at Highway 17 and 556 at the closed Esso station, and
that a fight ensued.  The scene was quiet when Posteraro arrived.  He was asked
to take some statements and spoke to John Vanderloo Sr. who reported that he
had been assaulted.  Vanderloo identified the person who assaulted him. 
Posteraro testified that Vanderloo’s arms pits were quite bruised.  Posteraro
arrested Harrison Knox for the assault on Vanderloo.  Knox was without injuries. 
It was the evidence of Posteraro that to prevent a continuation of any further
altercations, Harrison Knox was arrested and placed in his police cruiser. 
Posteraro described Harrison Knox as “very compliant”.
[85]          
Harrison Knox was handcuffed by Officer Posteraro. 
Posteraro testified that it was his practice to double lock the handcuffs to
prevent the handcuffs from getting tighter on the wrist.  Posteraro indicated
that he “took his time” in handcuffing Harrison Knox and that the handcuffs
were quite loose.  Posteraro was adamant in his evidence that he left his vehicle
running.  As he put it in his evidence, “I always leave the car running.  Absolutely
I left the car running on June 11.”  Posteraro testified that he did not lock
the cruiser from the outside because the cruiser door automatically locks from
the inside so the prisoner cannot leave the vehicle.
[86]          
It was Posteraro’s evidence that “within minutes”
of him placing Harrison Knox in the cruiser that Daniel Knox and Sherry Cole arrived
on scene.  They “caught my attention” as they came in quickly and braked
quickly and gravel was displaced.  Posteraro observed Daniel Knox go to his
cruiser and open the cruiser door.  He could see Harrison Knox’s feet on the
ground, but Harrison was still in the cruiser at that point in time.  Posteraro
then overheard an argument between Officer Nicolle and Dan Knox.  They are
facing each other at that point.  Posteraro heard Nicolle say to Knox “You are
under arrest for obstruct”.  It was the evidence of Officer Posteraro that “I see
Knox push Constable Nicolle”, after which he could hear Nicolle say to Knox
that he now was under arrest for assaulting a peace officer.
[87]          
When Posteraro heard this exchange, he went to
Dan Knox and Officer Nicolle.  This took only seconds, according to Posteraro. 
Sherry Cole was involved by this time.  According to Posteraro, Cole was in 
Nicolle’s face and being very aggressive.  Posteraro testified that “Cole was
very confrontational”.  It was the evidence of Posteraro that Cole grabbed his
arm as he approached  her.  Posteraro testified that he reached for Dan Knox’s
hand and said that he was under arrest, and he pulled it back and shoved his
left shoulder.  Referring to page 35 of his notes, when Posteraro asked Dan
Knox to get on the ground, Knox replied “screw you.  You can’t tell me what to
do.  I am nobody’s bitch – you can’t tell me what to do.”
[88]          
It was the evidence of Officer Posteraro that at
that point, he took his taser out and told Dan Knox that he’d be tasered if he
didn’t get on the ground.  Posteraro testified that prior to the video starting
they were walking along the parking lot following Daniel Knox.  Knox started to
walk to the driver’s side door of his truck.  At that point in time the taser
was deployed.
[89]          
Officer Posteraro testified that he deployed the
taser because Daniel Knox had assaulted two police officers, he was actively
resisting, and he was heading toward his vehicle.  It was the evidence of
Posteraro that Knox was going to his vehicle and if he had of gotten into his vehicle,
he could use it as a weapon, or it is possible that there may have been weapons
in the vehicle.  Posteraro indicated that the taser was applied for all these
reasons and the fact that Dan Knox refused to comply with our orders and “he
was not going to have it”.
[90]          
Officer Posteraro testified that once the taser
was deployed, Dan Knox was trying to get up and one of Knox’s legs caught the
left side of Posteraro’s groin area.  Posteraro testified that after viewing
the video, he does not believe that this was an intentional act by Dan Knox. 
It was Officer Posteraro’s evidence that as he was over Dan Knox, “Cole shoved
me from behind so hard I had to jump over Knox”.  The shove to Posteraro by
Sherry Cole is readily apparent on the video (Exhibit 2).  Posteraro testified
that Knox was trying to get up and was not complying to direction, so he was
tasered a second time.  As Posteraro put it in his evidence, Daniel Knox was
not complying – “He wanted to be in control of the situation”.
[91]          
As to getting Daniel Knox to the police cruiser
once he was back on his feet, Officer Posteraro describes Dan Knox as being “stiff”
and not wanting to get into the police cruiser.  Posteraro led Knox by one arm
with Officer Nicolle on the other arm.  Constable Bruni arrested.  Officer
Posteraro describes Daniel Knox as having to be “forced into the back seat of
the cruiser”.  It was the evidence of Posteraro that Bruni was in front of Knox
and that Bruni did not kick Knox.  Posteraro did see Bruni apply one shin rake
to Daniel Knox.  Posteraro reported that there was no celebration, no laughing
or no high-fives after the arrest had been completed.
[92]          
Exhibit 54 is a use of force report that Officer
Posteraro completed as a result of the incident.  The taser was noted in that
report as being effective and the reason it was deployed was “in order to
protect self, prevent escape, and effect arrest”.  It was Officer Posteraro’s
view that using the taser was the best option available given the situation. 
Other options such as the baton, pepper spray, or the use of a handgun elevated
the chance of injury.  Posteraro testified that the taser had the less potential
of anyone getting injured.  Given the size of Daniel Knox (six-foot-three) and
Posteraro’s size (five-foot-ten, 180 lbs.) there would likely be injuries if
pressure points had been used.  Posteraro testified that he has never received
training not to use the words “calm down” when dealing with an individual.
[93]          
As with Officer Nicolle, Officer Posteraro was
cross-examined vigorously and extensively.  Officer Posteraro was asked to draw
a diagram of the scene – where individuals and vehicles and buildings were.  It
was suggested to Officer Posteraro that the diagram he drew at trial was “radically”
different than the diagram he was asked to draw at discovery.  Posteraro admitted
that the diagram he drew at trial was a poor diagram but “the best recollection
I have of nine years ago”.
[94]          
Officer Posteraro testified that he obtained
information from John Vanderloo Sr. before he arrested Harrison Knox.  He said
that Vanderloo told him he was assaulted and that he showed Posteraro his
injuries.  Before arresting Harrison Knox, Posteraro did not ask him for his
side of the story.  It was the evidence of Officer Posteraro that the
information that he gathered “gave him reasonable and probable grounds” to make
the arrest of Harrison Knox and by doing so, he believes “that I did the right
thing to prevent a situation from getting worse”.
[95]          
When plaintiffs’ counsel suggested in cross-examination
to Posteraro that it was possible that Harrison Knox’s handcuffs were too
tight, Posteraro disagreed, indicating that “I know these handcuffs when I put
them on, and he was very compliant, and the handcuffs were loose”.
[96]          
Officer Posteraro testified that he saw Dan Knox
go to his vehicle to open the door for his son.  As Posteraro put it in his
evidence, “This never happened in 24 years in my career where someone opened a
cruiser door to let a prisoner out”.  “Within seconds” of the cruiser door, Dan
Knox and Officer Nicolle meet up.  As to when Nicolle told Knox he was under
arrest, at trial Posteraro said that it occurred while Nicolle approached Knox,
whereas at discovery, Posteraro indicated it was when Knox and Nicolle were
face to face.  At discoveries, Posteraro describes what took place with Nicolle
and Knox as “a conversation”.  At trial, Posteraro refers to it as “an argument”.
 Posteraro was adamant in cross-examination that he remembers the shove by Dan
Knox to Officer Posteraro, but had difficulty at trial recalling the specifics
of the interaction between Officer Nicolle and Daniel Knox.
[97]          
Officer Posteraro was firm in his evidence that
he left his police cruiser running – “I always leave my car on – I run it all
the time”.  As with other witnesses, Posteraro recalls everything at the scene
transpiring quickly.  He described from the time Harrison was put in the car to
Dan being tasered as happening “in minutes” although “it seemed like days”.  In
his note entries, Posteraro has Harrison being arrested at 13:18 and the taser
being deployed at 13:34, a 16-minute difference.
[98]          
In cross-examination, Posteraro agreed with the
suggestion put to him by plaintiffs’ counsel that the video depicts Sherry Cole
trying to de-escalate the situation.  As to Nicolle never witnessing a push by
Dan Knox on Posteraro, it was Posteraro’s evidence that Sherry Cole was in
Nicolle’s face at this point in time as might explain why Nicolle didn’t see
this.  That is just speculation by Posteraro who admitted that he does not know
why Nicolle did not witness this.
[99]          
Constable Peter Van Den Diepstraten testified
that he was dispatched to the Esso location on a 1078 call, which is equivalent
to a 911 call for police.  He came in the scene with his vehicle’s lights flashing
and siren on.  By his own admission, Officer Van Den Diepstraten was “coming in
hard”.  He arrived at 13:40 and described the scene as “absolute chaos”.  He
observed Sherry Cole red-faced, screaming, yelling with his fist clenched. 
Cole was not complying with Nicolle’s direction to get back or she was going to
be arrested.  Officer Van Den Diepstraten testified that he told Cole to get
back or she was going to be arrested.  He grabbed Cole’s left wrist, but she
broke free and retreated.  Officer Van Den Diepstraten testified that telling
Cole to back off had no effect on her or her disengaging.  Officer Nicolle told
Sherry Cole that she was under arrest for obstruct.  Officer Van Den
Diepstraten guided Sherry Cole to his police cruiser but Cole was not compliant
and was trying to pull away.  Officer Van Den Diepstraten put Cole over the
hood of the cruiser and attempted to place handcuffs on Cole.  Officer Van
Diepstraten described himself as being “donkey kicked” by Sherry Cole which
caused him to stretch out and lean on Cole to try to avoid being kicked in the
groin area.  Cole was described as trying to kick off the cruiser.  With the assistance
of Officer Nicolle, Officer Van Den Diepstraten got Sherry Cole handcuffed from
behind and into the police cruiser.
[100]      
Officer Van Den Diepstraten indicated in his evidence
that at no point did he strike Sherry Cole or kick her or “use his belt stuff on
her”.  At 14:05, Officer Van Den Diepstraten left the scene for the OPP detachment
in Sault Ste. Marie with Sherry Cole in his cruiser.  Officer Van Den
Diepstraten denied the suggestion that he kicked close the Knox vehicle.  At
the station at 15:05, Sherry Cole was released from police custody on a promise
to appear (Exhibit 39).
[101]      
In cross-examination, Constable Van Den
Diepstraten indicated that he was responding to a 1078 call, so he was
concerned with officer safety when he arrived on the scene.  He described
Sherry Cole as upset, screaming and non-compliant.  Officer Van Den Diepstraten
described it as “an issue that needed to be addressed”.  At one point in his evidence,
Officer Van Den Diepstraten testified that he didn’t know Posteraro was on the
scene and in cross-examination he testified that Posteraro told him to “get her
off me”, referring to Sherry Cole.  There is no reference to Posteraro telling
Van Den Diepstraten to get Sherry Cole off him in the notes of Officer Van Den
Diepstraten.  Officer Van Den Diepstraten tried to explain this inconsistency
in his evidence by stating that he didn’t see Officer Posteraro “immediately
when I got there”.  Officer Van Den Diepstraten’s will say statement indicates
that he observed Posteraro when he arrived at the scene.  This is at odds with
his evidence at trial, Officer Van Den Diepstraten indicating that “Constable
Posteraro is not a part of my recollection anymore”.
[102]      
Counsel for the plaintiffs in cross-examination
was able to point out to Constable Van Den Diepstraten that his notes do not
contain many of the details he is giving in evidence at trial.  When asked
about this, Constable Van Den Diepstraten gave a long explanation that really
did not explain or respond to this difficulty with his evidence.
[103]      
The will say statement of Officer Van Den
Diepstraten indicates that Bruni was pushing Cole back.  At trial, Officer Van
Den Diepstraten no longer recalled events this way, testifying that Bruni was
telling Cole to get back, not pushing her back.  Officer Van Den Diepstraten
testified that he could not recall whose cruiser he put Cole over or exactly
where the cruiser was in relation to the other cruisers.  Officer Van Den
Diepstraten described leaning on Cole’s tricep and shoulder area to keep her
pinned to the cruiser.  Officer Van Den Diepstraten testified that he had to
stretch out while leaning on Sherry Cole to avoid being kicked by Sherry Cole. 
While Officer Van Den Diepstraten was leaning against Sherry Cole, she was
pushing off the car in an attempt to resist, according to Officer Van Den
Diepstraten.  Officer Van Den Diepstraten testified that “I am not able to keep
control of her.  She is pushing away, and I am just trying to keep her up
against the car.”  Eventually, Sherry Cole is placed in the police vehicle and
transported to the police station.
[104]      
Although Sgt. Kenneth Spahr is a named defendant
in this action and called as a witness to testify at the trial, his role in
this matter is marginal.  As the acting Staff Sergeant, Officer Spahr was available
if the investigating officer had questions or needed resources.  These
inquiries would be made to him.  Officer Spahr attended at the scene at 1:41
and left the scene at 2:55 p.m.  When he arrived, the commotion had ended, and
the ambulance was there as the taser had been deployed.  Officer Spahr
testified that he did not use force on anyone, arrest anyone, or take anyone
into custody.  He did speak to Daniel Knox in the cell area at the OPP station
and it was the evidence of Spahr that he could smell an odour on the breath of
Daniel Knox which he believed to be alcohol.
[105]      
Sgt. Spahr indicated that there was a media
release of the incident and charges laid and that in a driving incident a media
release is mandatory (Exhibit 6).  The name of Mr. Knox’s company was not put
on the media release.  In cross-examination, Sgt. Spahr agreed with the suggestion
put to him by plaintiffs’ counsel that a name on a media release could damage a
person’s reputation.
[106]      
Sgt. Spahr testified that on June 13, 2014, he was
told by Officer Posteraro that John Vanderloo Jr. had videotaped the incident
on his phone.  This was viewed by Sgt. Spahr who burned two discs of the video (Exhibit
2).
[107]      
Chris Lawrence is a former police officer, a
former instructor at the Ontario Police College, a co-author of an RCMP report
on the safety of taser use, and has been previously qualified as an expert in
75 cases involving police use of force.  In the case at bar, Mr. Lawrence was
qualified as an expert on education and training of police officers in Ontario regarding:
[108]      
Mr. Lawrence pointed out that the Ontario Use of Force Model
(Exhibit 42) has the following direction at the bottom of the wheel:
[109]      
Mr. Lawrence described the technique of de-escalation as one of
trying to build a rapport with the subject and engaging in active listening.  He
described de-escalation as a “reciprocal process”.  As he put it, “if the
subject doesn’t respond it is not going to be successful.  You can’t
de-escalate all by yourself.”  Mr. Lawrence opined that when a subject turns
and walks away they are not reciprocating.  If there is no reciprocity then the
officer must make an arrest as the officer is suppose to take control of the situation. 
Mr. Lawrence testified that “there is no receipt to follow that works in every situation. 
It’s common sense.  You don’t let things get out of control.”
[110]      
Mr. Lawrence testified that if an officer is attacked, he has to
take action.  If the subject is in flight, you have to take action.  If
excessive repetition of commands are ignored, if talking doesn’t get you
anywhere, you have to take action.  In commenting on Mr. Summerville’s objection
to the use of the words “calm down”, Mr. Lawrence testified that the OPP is not
trained on the use of the phrase “calm down”.  It was Mr. Lawrence’s view that
to suggest that in saying “calm down” is going to cause all of the problems is
a bit of a stretch.
[111]      
It was Mr. Lawerence’s evidence that if the court accepts that
Officer Nicolle was pushed by Dan Knox, the police reaction would be consistent
with police training.  Mr. Lawrence indicated that “I don’t see a problem with that”.
[112]      
The video (Exhibit 2) was played for Mr. Lawrence.  It was Mr.
Lawrence’s view that the police officers are trying to do things that are
consistent with de-escalation, but he added that “talking to someone who is
responding negatively is delaying the inevitable”.  The law requires an officer
to take physical control and the pulling away from police officers is active resistance. 
 As Mr. Lawrence put it in his evidence, “there is a time for talking and a
time to act”.
[113]      
Mr. Lawrence describes Daniel Knox, as seen in the video, to  be
upset but not in crisis.  He has the same opinion with respect to Sherry Cole. 
In Mr. Lawrence’s opinion, the attempts by the police officers to take physical
control were consistent with police training.  The view of Mr. Lawrence is that
had  Daniel Knox not pulled away from Officer Posteraro when he grabbed his arm
in attempt to control him, the use of force would not have been necessary.  As
to the force used by the police on Daniel Knox, Mr. Lawrence indicated that he
agreed with Mr. Summerville that the use of pepper spray or a baton strike was
not appropriate and would have likely resulted in a higher chance of injury to
Daniel Knox and to the police officer.  It was Mr. Lawrence’s opinion that the use
of the taser had less potential for injury.  It is appropriate for the officer to
deploy the taser not just when the subject’s behaviour has been assaultive, but
also when the officer believes that there is an immediate need to control the
subject.  It was the opinion of Chris Lawrence that Officer Posteraro’s use of
the taser on Daniel Knox was consistent with police training.  When Daniel Knox
tried to get up, the second taser response was consistent with police training,
in the view of Chris Lawerence.
[114]      
Mr. Lawrence testified that if a person is actually in crisis he
should not be yelled at but Lawrence is of the opinion that Daniel Knox was “upset”
but not in crisis, disagreeing with Mr. Summerville on this point.  The use of a
shin rake on Daniel Knox was consistent with police training, in Mr. Lawrence’s
view.  As he put it in his evidence, “that is the purpose of it – to get the
subject into the police cruiser”.  Mr. Lawrence also opined that Officer
Posteraro properly applied the handcuffs on Harrison Knox.  Mr. Lawrence was
also of the view that there was nothing untoward in the officers pushing Sherry
Cole up against the police cruiser to effect the arrest on her.  As he put it
in his evidence, “that’s done all the time”.  Mr. Lawrence was also of the view
that police officers are not trained to lock their police cruisers from the
outside.
[115]      
When asked in cross-examination about empathy and building
rapport with a subject, Mr. Lawrence replied that “there is a time to talk and
a time to act”.  If it is appropriate in the circumstances, building rapport with
a subject should be done.  It was Mr. Lawrence’s view that the event was “gaining
momentum” and there was no reciprocation  on Daniel Knox’s part, although the
police were following him around and giving him a chance to comply.  Mr. Lawrence
emphasized in his evidence that he believes in de-escalation and building rapport
“if you have the opportunity and it is practical given the situation”.
[116]      
It was pointed out to Chris Lawrence in cross-examination that
the video shows that Daniel Knox was not told why he was under arrest.  Mr. Lawrence
agreed that telling a person why he is under arrest might help de-escalate the situation. 
Having said this, Mr. Lawrence also opined that “there comes a time when you
move to the arrest stage to take control of the subject”.
[117]      
Chris Lawrence agreed to the suggestion put to him in cross-examination
that in the video it appears that Sherry Cole was trying to de-escalate, trying
to prevent the situation from getting worse.
[118]      
Chris Lawrence agreed that repeating words or commands that are
not working is not helpful and is contrary to police training.  Mr. Lawerence
believes that using phrases such as “calm down” is going to come out as a part
of a person’s background.  Mr. Lawrence doesn’t remember the phrase “calm down”
as one where there was an exact prohibition in police training.  Mr. Lawrence
was of the opinion that in the totality of the situation, Officer Nicolle’s use
of the words “calm down” conformed police practice and procedure.
[119]      
Dr. Darren Costain testified as a witness for the defendants. 
Dr. Costain is an experienced orthopedic surgeon.  He was qualified as an
expert on the diagnosis and treatment of wrist pain and injuries.  Dr. Costain
examined the wrist of Harrison Knox.  Dr. Costain testified that objectively
there is a difference in size between the right and left wrist.  Harrison’s
right wrist is slightly swollen as compared to the left wrist.  There is no instability
in the wrist.  There is no pain in the wrist.  From viewing the wrist, the only
thing that Dr. Costain was able to ascertain is that Harrison Knox had some
swelling of his right wrist.
[120]      
Diagnostic imaging confirmed a ligament tear in the right wrist. 
It was the opinion of Dr. Costain that the mechanical applying of handcuffs
around the wrist would not be a cause of a ligament tear.  The applying of the
handcuffs likely aggravated a pre-existing condition that took several months
to settle down.  The right wrist problem experienced by Harrison Knox was more
likely related to a previous altercation than to the application of handcuffs
by police, in Dr. Costain’s opinion.
[121]      
Dr. Costain was not shaken in cross-examination nor were his
views about the right wrist of Harrison Knox altered.  Dr. Costain was firm in
his opinion the injury to Harrison Knox was not likely a result of applying handcuffs. 
The handcuffs brought the pain to light but did not cause it.  The applying of
handcuffs alone were not likely to bring it from an asymptomatic state to a symptomatic
state, in Dr. Costain’s opinion.
[122]      
The power of the police to arrest without warrant for criminal
offences is primarily governed by section 495 of the Criminal Code of Canada,
R.S.C. 1985 c. C-46. This section reads as follows:
[123]      
Section 25(1) of the Criminal Code of Canada authorizes a
police officer to use “as much force as is necessary” in the execution of their
duties, including making and maintaining an arrest.  In particular, section
25(1) reads as follows:
[124]      
The short video (Exhibit  2) captures some of the salient
interaction between Dan Knox and the police, including the taser being
deployed, but the video does not show some of the most important interaction
between Dan  Knox and the police.  In particular, the video does not show Mr.
Knox’s interaction with Officer Nicolle after he opened the police cruiser
door, what was said by Mr. Knox and Officer Nicolle, and any physical interaction
between them.  What the court has to examine is the testimony of Daniel Knox, Officer
Nicolle and Cindy Grenier to determine what occurred in the interactions between
Daniel Knox and Officer Nicole prior to the video commencing.
[125]      
Daniel Knox testified that when Constable Keith Nicolle
approached him he was told he was under arrest, Nicolle grabbed his bicep and
that he pulled his arm back.  Daniel Knox was adamant that he did not push or
shove Officer Nicolle.  Keith Nicolle testified that he told Daniel Knox that
he was under arrest for obstructing police, that he reached out with his right
hand to take physical control of Daniel Knox at which point Knox pushed him.  A
crucial finding of fact is whether Daniel Knox pushed Constable Keith Nicolle
before the taser was deployed.
[126]      
Neither the evidence of Daniel Knox nor the evidence of Constable
Keith Nicolle is perfect.  There are problems with the evidence of both of
them.  I found the evidence of Daniel Knox at times to be exaggerated,
embellished and self-serving.  His evidence that he was kicked by Officer Bruni
“15 to 20 times” in the back of his leg is hard to believe.  Even his daughter,
Sherry Cole, describes two to three kicks to the back of her father’s leg, not
the 15 to 20 times as described by Daniel Knox.  Mr. Knox is left with no
bruises or injuries to the back of his leg or medical treatment sought despite
his assertion that he was kicked 15 to 20 times in the back of the leg.  Daniel
Knox describes “a blast of heat, like a blast furnace” when he opened the
cruiser door where his son Harrison was lodged.  This is despite the fact that
the Environment Canada report for the weather that time of day (Exhibit 12)
indicated that it was 16 degrees Celsius at 12:00 noon and 18 degrees Celsius at
2:00 p.m.  These are not high temperatures that one would expect would generate
the type of conditions in the vehicle that Daniel Knox described.  Daniel Knox
testified that he was trying to get the police officers to talk to him.  I find
that hard to believe when watching the video.  Mr. Knox was not trying to engage
the police.  He was walking around, ignoring police commands and it appears
from the video that he was not in the mood for communication.  Daniel Knox
likes to paint a picture of him being calm, compliant and wanting to cooperate
with the police but what is depicted in the video shows otherwise.  Daniel Knox
would not agree with even the obvious in his evidence if it did not favour his
case.  He disagreed with the suggestion put to him in cross-examination that he
made it possible for Harrison Knox to get out of the car by opening the car
door for him.  Despite the fact that the answer to this question is obvious,
Daniel Knox would not agree to it.
[127]      
I also find the assertion of Daniel Knox that he was unaware of
the disposition of his charges and that his counsel negotiated a withdrawal of
his charges in exchange for a monetary contribution to a charity difficult to
believe. Mr. Knox was represented by experienced criminal counsel.  The charges
were disposed of in a manner which was very favourable to Daniel Knox.  Mr.
Knox’s assertion that he was in the dark about things is difficult to accept.  Although
Mr. Knox testified that he fired Mr. Orazietti when he did not follow his
instructions, no complaint was made to the Law Society of Ontario about Mr.
Orazietti.
[128]      
The cross-examination of Constable Keith Nicolle exposed many of
the inconsistencies and inaccuracies in his evidence.  Officer Nicolle’s notes
describes Daniel Knox pushing Officer Posteraro.  This was clearly an error as
shown in the video (Exhibit 2) which does not show Dan Knox pushing Officer
Posteraro.  Officer Nicolle’s will say statement is at odds with his notes on
this point.  His will say states that the “male pulled away from Posteraro”. 
Officer Nicolle agreed that there was a significant difference between what was
in his notes and what was in his will say statement about Daniel Knox pushing
Officer Posteraro.  Officer Nicolle could not provide a satisfactory
explanation to the court as to why this difference existed, attributing it to a
“clerical error”.
[129]      
Keith Nicolle was also inaccurate in his evidence about Harrison
Knox getting out of the police cruiser.  His notes indicate that Dan Knox “let the
prisoner out of the car”.  At trial, Officer Nicolle could not recall whether
Harrison got out of the car when his father opened the door.  The video
(Exhibit 2) shows Harrison remaining in the police cruiser when the door to the
cruiser is opened.  At discovery, Officer Nicolle testified that at the time he
was pushed by  Dan Knox, Officer Posteraro did not come over to him.  Officer
Nicolle’s notes indicate that Posteraro did come over to him with his taser
out.  At trial, Officer Nicolle was unsure whether Officer Posteraro came over
to him.
[130]      
In his notes, Officer Nicolle indicates that Sherry Cole was
screaming at the officers before her father, Daniel Knox, was tasered.  At trial,
Officer Nicolle indicated that it was not until Dan Knox was tasered that the
screaming by Sherry Cole started.  Officer Nicolle’s attempt at trying to
reconcile this evidence was unsatisfactory.
[131]      
All of this would be concerning to the court if it were not for
the evidence of Cindy Grenier.  Ms. Grenier observed Daniel Knox open the
police cruiser door where Harrison Knox was lodged.  Ms. Grenier testified that
there was “lots of anger and agitation” from Daniel Knox.  Ms. Grenier observed
Officer Nicolle and Daniel Knox meet.  Ms. Grenier testified that Daniel Knox
pushed Officer Nicolle, a shove toward the chest area.  Ms. Grenier testified
that “when they came together, Mr. Knox pushed the officer – a push, like a shove
in the chest area”. Ms. Grenier testified that Mr. Knox did not pull away from
Officer Nicolle but rather pushed Officer Nicolle.
[132]      
Cindy Grenier was cross-examined vigorously by counsel for the
plaintiffs.  She was candid in her admission that she had difficulty in
remembering the sequence of events that afternoon, namely, in what order
matters occurred.  For instance, her will say to the police had a different
order of events than her testimony at the trial.  Despite events being out of
order, Ms. Grenier was adamant “that everything I said in the statement was
correct, it was just in the wrong order”.   Regardless of the sequence of
events, Cindy Grenier remained consistent both in her statement and in her
evidence at  trial that the “officer went towards him, and he shoved the
officer”, referring to Officer Nicolle and Daniel Knox.
[133]      
I found Cindy Grenier to be a compelling and credible witness.  She
was candid about the difficulties in her evidence, which she fully acknowledged. 
She would not commit to an answer unless she was satisfied that it was truthful. 
Unlike Officer Nicolle or Daniel Knox, Cindy Grenier is a disinterested third
party without a vested interest in the outcome of the litigation.  Even though
her statement to police may not line up exactly with her evidence at trial, Cindy
Grenier was consistent, firm and unwavering in both her statement to police and
her evidence at trial that after Dan Knox was told to get away from the police
cruiser and he and Officer Nicolle were walking toward each other, that when
they met, Daniel Knox pushed Officer Nicolle in the chest area.  On this, Cindy
Grenier was clear, consistent and unwavering, and I accept her evidence on this
point.
[134]      
On the totality of the evidence, the court finds as a fact that
after Officer Keith Nicolle and Daniel Knox walked toward each other and met,
that Daniel Knox pushed Officer Nicolle in the chest area.  This was not Daniel
Knox pulling away from Officer Nicolle when he attempted to grab him.  This was
a push to the chest area of Officer Keith Nicolle by Daniel Knox.  In my view,
this has been proven on the evidence on a balance of probabilities.
[135]      
Once Officer Nicolle was pushed, he had reasonable and probable
grounds to arrest Daniel Knox on the charge of assault.  An action of pushing a
police officer would constitute assaultive behaviour in the use of force model
(Exhibit 42).  The plaintiffs’ expert witness, Steven Summerville, testified
that if the court accepted that Daniel Knox pushed Officer Nicolle, that Daniel
Knox assaulted the police officer and that at that point in time the officer
can use whatever force is reasonable to place that person under arrest.  As Steven
Summerville put it in his evidence, “any time an officer is assaulted there is
reasonable cause to place a person under arrest”.
[136]      
As to the use of the taser, Steven Summerville was unable to
dispute the opinion of Chris Lawrence that the use of the taser was
considerably safer than the use of a baton or control techniques in attempting
to take control of a subject that was under arrest.  The plaintiffs’ expert
witness, Steven Summerville, testified that if the court accepts that active
resistance was engaged, then the use of the taser by police was appropriate.  Mr.
Summerville also accepted the suggestion that by walking away from the police
that Daniel Knox was engaged in “active resistance”.  It follows that if the
use of a taser was a reasonable response to a person engaged in active resistance
that the use of a taser was a reasonable response to a person engaged in
assaultive behaviour.  By walking away from the police and being non-compliant
to the police commands to get on the ground, Daniel Knox was being actively
resistant.  By pushing Officer Nicolle in the chest area, Daniel Knox was
engaged in assaultive behaviour.  Both actions justified the police authorities
to use the taser to attempt to take control of Daniel Knox and place him under arrest. 
I find that the use of the taser by the police was reasonable and justified on
the totality of the evidence in this case.  The police had reasonable and
probable grounds to arrest Daniel Knox.  The police use of force with respect
to Daniel Knox, both in his being tasered and afterward in placing him in the
police cruiser, was lawful and justified on the totality of the evidence.
[137]      
Much time was spent in this case on the issue of de-escalation.  It
was the opinion of the plaintiffs’ expert witness, Steven Summerville, that
Officer Nicolle and the other officers involved did not adequately try to
de-escalate the situation with Daniel Knox or attempt to establish a rapport
with him or lines of communication with him.  The defendants’ expert, Chris
Lawrence, was of the opposite view opining that de-escalation is a reciprocal
process and that attempts were made to engage Daniel Knox but that he was not
interested.  The suggestion made by the plaintiffs is that the police were
negligent in their attempts to de-escalate the situation.  I do not agree.  The
police attempted to engage Daniel Knox, but the video clearly indicates that he
was not interested in communication.  The reciprocity needed to engage and
de-escalate was not present.  Daniel Knox did not stand still to have a
discussion.  He was constantly in motion.  He walked away from police and even
the plaintiffs’ expert, Mr. Summerville, agreed that walking away from the
police made it more difficult for the police to have communication with Daniel
Knox.  It was Mr. Summerville’s view that the repeating of the words “calm down”
was not an acceptable de-escalation tactic and that the repeating of these
words only escalated the situation.  I agree with the view of Chris Lawrence
that if excessive commands are ignored, then action  has to be taken and that
repeating the phrase “calm down” will escalate the situation is a bit of a
stretch.  There is a time to talk and a time to act, as Mr. Lawerence put it,
and if a person is walking away from you, is not communicative and is not
following your commands, the time to talk has ended and the time to act has begun.
[138]      
It is not unfair to say that to a large extent Daniel Knox is the
author of his own misfortune.  He was told to stay away from the scene by the OPP
dispatcher, but he ignored this suggestion.  Immediately upon arriving at the
scene, he opens the police cruiser door.  He ignores the commands of police to
get on the ground. He pushes Officer Keith Nicolle.  He heads toward his
vehicle.  He continued to ignore the commands of the police officers and was
engaged in active resistance and assaultive behaviour.  This necessitated the
use of the taser to control the behaviour of Daniel Knox and to place him under
arrest.
[139]      
For the aforegoing reasons, I dismiss the claims of Daniel Knox.
[140]      
In my view, the police had reasonable and probable grounds to
place Harrison Knox under arrest with respect to his assault of John Vanderloo
Sr.  Officer Posteraro interviewed John Vanderloo Sr.  He observed bruising on
Mr. Vanderloo Sr. which was consistent with an assault on Mr. Vanderloo. 
Officer Posteraro testified that he observed no similar bruising on Harrison
Knox.  Although Officer Posteraro did not get Harrison Knox’s side of the story
or version of events prior to arrest, there was no requirement for Officer
Posteraro to do so.   As noted in the Ontario Court of Appeal decision in 495794
Ontario Ltd. v. Barclay, 2016 ONCA 656 at para. 84, before making an arrest
that “police are not required to exhaust all avenues of investigation,
establish that an accused has no defence, or even obtain an accused’s version
of events”.  The standard of reasonable and probable grounds is not unduly high
(R. v. Buse, 2010 ONCA 554 at para. 70) and the Supreme Court of Canada
has cautioned courts against “second guessing reasonable exercise of discretion”
by police and imposing “liability by hindsight” (Hull v. Hamilton-Wentworth
Regional Police Service Board, 2007 SCC 41 at paras. 54 and 68).
[141]      
I conclude that the arrest of Harrison Knox by Officer Posteraro
was lawful.  As to Harrison Knox being lodged in the police cruiser, I found it
difficult to accept that it was hot like a furnace in the police cruiser given the
weather conditions that existed on June 11, 2014.  Officer Posteraro was
adamant in his evidence that he left the police cruiser running.  As he put it
in his evidence, “I always leave the car running” and testified that he was “absolutely”
sure that he left the car running when Harrison Knox was in it.  I have no
reason to doubt the evidence of Constable Mario Posteraro in this regard.
[142]      
As to damage to the wrist of Harrison Knox by the application of
the handcuffs on him by Officer Posteraro, it was the evidence of Steven
Summerville that if handcuffs are applied properly as to location and tightness
that you would not expect damage to the wrist to occur.  It was the evidence of
Dr. Darren Costain, which he was unshaken in cross-examination about, that the
damage that Harrison Knox was complaining about to his wrist could not have
been caused by the handcuffs.  Therefore, it follows that more than likely
Officer Posteraro is correct about the handcuffs, namely, that he took his time
in handcuffing Harrison Knox, that he double locked the handcuffs to prevent
the handcuffs from tightening on the wrist, which was his usual practice, and
that the handcuffs were quite loose on the wrist of Harrison Knox.
[143]      
On the totality of the evidence, I find that Harrison Knox was
lawfully arrested by Officer Posteraro, that he was placed in a police cruiser
that was running, and that the handcuffing of Harrison Knox was properly executed
by Officer Posteraro who double locked the handcuffs to prevent tightening.  I accept
the uncontradicted opinion of Dr. Darren Costain that any injury to the wrist
of Harrison Knox that he was complaining of was not caused by the handcuffs being
placed on his wrist.
[144]      
For the aforegoing reasons, I dismiss the claim of Harrison Knox.
[145]      
Sherry Cole acknowledged and admitted in her evidence that she
pushed Officer Mario Posteraro off of her father, Daniel Knox, when he was
applying the taser to him.  She did so with such force that Officer Posteraro
lost his balance.  This action by Sherry Cole was an assault by Sherry Cole.  This
gave the police reasonable and probable grounds to arrest Sherry Cole.  There
was nothing unlawful about the arrest of Sherry Cole.  It was a lawful arrest
by police.
[146]      
On the totality of the evidence, there is no doubt that force was
used to place Sherry Cole under arrest.  Sherry Cole testified that she was
walking toward her father’s truck when Constable Peter Van Den Diepstraten
arrived at the scene “flying in from the highway” and kicked the door shut
which angered Ms. Cole.  It was Ms. Cole’s evidence that Officer Van Den
Diepstraten had her pinned on the hood of the vehicle.  Ms. Cole felt “violated”
and her response was to resist and kick her leg out in an attempt to kick the
police officer off of her.  Constable Peter Van Den Diepstraten testified that
when he arrived on the scene he observed Sherry Cole, red-faced, screaming,
yelling, with her fist clenched.  Cole was not complying with directions.  The officer
describes Sherry Cole as being non-compliant and that she had to be restrained
on the hood of the vehicle in an attempt to place handcuffs on her.  Officer
Van Den Diepstraten testified that Sherry Cole was attempting to kick him and
with the assistance of Officer Nicolle, Sherry Cole was handcuffed and placed
in the police cruiser.  It was the evidence of Officer Keith Nicolle that
Sherry Cole was resisting “slightly”.
[147]      
However slight, there is no doubt in my mind that Sherry Cole was
agitated, upset, and generally worked up after Daniel Knox was tasered and
while Officer Van Den Diepstraten was attempting to place her under arrest. 
There is no doubt in my mind that Sherry Cole was resisting Officer Van Den
Diepstraten’s attempt to place her under arrest and to secure physical control
of her. There is no doubt in my mind that Sherry Cole was kicking at Officer
Van Den Diepstraten and that he had to use physical force in the circumstance
to effect her arrest.  Was the use of force justified or in any way excessive? 
I conclude that the use of force on Sherry Cole was justified and necessary to
place her under arrest and take physical control of her.  The use of force was
not excessive, and Sherry Cole sustained no injuries as a result of the use of
force applied by Officer Van Den Diepstraten against her.  It was the view of
the expert Chris Lawrence that there was nothing untoward in the officers
pushing Sherry Cole up against the police cruiser to effect the arrest on her. 
As Mr. Lawerence put it, “that’s done all the time”.
[148]      
The court finds that Officer Van Den Diepstraten had reasonable
and probable grounds to arrest Sherry Cole for assaulting Officer Posteraro and
for obstruction.  The use of force by the officers in placing Sherry Cole under
arrest, handcuffing her and placing her in the police cruiser was justified,
reasonable and lawful.
[149]      
For the aforegoing reasons, the claim by Sherry Cole is
dismissed.
[150]      
Given the court’s finding that the arrest of all three plaintiffs
was lawful and the use of force by the police was both lawful and justified, it
is not necessary for the court to comment on whether the charges laid against
the plaintiffs were resolved in their favour.  The arrest of the plaintiffs was
lawful and, therefore, any claim for malicious prosecution cannot succeed.
[151]      
Although my finding on the issue of liability does not require me
to comment on the issue of damages, I wish to do so briefly.  In view of the evidence
of Dr. Darren Costain, the damages that would be awarded to Harrison Knox would
be minimal, in the $15,000 range.  Similarly, the damages to Sherry Cole would
also be minimal, in the same range of $15,000.  Sherry Cole did not prove any long-term
physical or psychological impairment as a result of the incident.  Her damages would
be confined to the events of June 11, 2014 themselves, and as a result, any
damages awarded to her would be minimal.
[152]      
With respect to Daniel Knox, in his evidence, Mr. Knox described both
physical and psychological imports on him as a result of the incident on June
11, 2014.  Mr. Knox described a sense of isolation, not having the same
confidence that he had before, depression, obsession with the event to the
point that he can’t get it out of his head, sleep interruption and deprivation,
and physical pain and soreness in his Achilles area as a result of being
kicked.
[153]      
Dr. Andrew Shaule is a registered psychologist who testified on
behalf of the plaintiffs.  Various testing was done on Daniel Knox.  Dr. Shaule
interviewed Mr. Knox for 40 minutes.  As a result, Dr. Shaule diagnosed Daniel Knox
with having (a) adjustment disorder with anxiety; (b) major depressive
disorder; (c) features of post-traumatic disorder.  Dr. Shaule described these
difficulties as a reaction to the event with police and difficulty in adjusting
his life as a result of his experience with the police.  It was Dr. Shaule’s
view that these difficulties Daniel Knox was experiencing are as a result of
his interaction with the police.  As Dr. Shaule put it in his evidence, these
diagnoses would not have been in place before the incident with police.  Dr. Shaule
recommended that Daniel Knox partake in 18 sessions of cognitive behaviour
therapy with a counsellor and was of the view that Mr. Knox’s progress will be
poor unless he engages in “significant treatment”.  As of trial, Daniel Knox
has not engaged in this course of treatment as recommended by Dr. Shaule who
views this as him “missing an opportunity to improve”.
[154]      
Dr. Percy Wright is a clinical psychologist who was called as an
expert witness by the defendants. Similarly with Dr. Shaule, Dr. Wright
performed tests on Daniel Knox and conducted an interview with him.  Unlike Dr.
Shaule, Dr. Wright does not see all of Daniel Knox’s difficulty as arising from
his interaction with police on June 11, 2014.  Dr. Wright’s opinion is that
Daniel Knox had pre-existing conditions prior to June 11, 2014, including the
death of his wife, his difficulty with anger, and his relationship with his
parents.  Dr. Wright opined that Mr. Knox was suffering from adjustment
disorder and anxiety but indicated that it was not clear that he was suffering from
depressive disorder.  Dr. Wright disagreed with Dr. Shaule’s report and
diagnoses that Daniel Knox is suffering from major depressive disorder and also
disagreed that a single event - Mr. Knox’s interaction with police – would lead
to the conditions that Daniel Knox was experiencing.  Dr. Wright does not agree
that one single event can make a person, so he does not agree with Dr. Shaule
that this event with the police is solely responsible for the difficulties that
Daniel Knox is experiencing.  Dr. Wright does agree, however, that there was an
emotional impact on Daniel Knox as a result of his interaction with police.  The
June 11, 2014 incident exacerbated and aggravated conditions which Daniel Knox
was experiencing.
[155]      
Dr. Wright’s view that Daniel Knox had pre-existing psychological
difficulties prior to the June 11, 2014 incident with the police makes a great
deal of sense.  The court heard the evidence of Daniel Knox on the impact the
death of his wife had on him and the difficulty he was experiencing in trying
to cope with the death of his wife.  Daniel Knox described the death of his wife
on December 17, 2012 as having “a significant impact on him" and that he
was “very upset and grieving the loss of his wife”.  Undoubtedly that was still
a problem for him on June 11, 2014 that caused him emotional and psychological
difficulties.  It is also undeniable that the June 11, 2014 incident with the
police aggravated any pre-existing emotional and psychological difficulties
that Daniel Knox was experiencing.
[156]      
If I am incorrect in my conclusions about the arrest of Daniel
Knox and the use of the taser on him by police, I would assess damages to
Daniel Knox in the amount of $75,000.
[157]      
The claims of all plaintiffs against all defendants, in its
entirety, is dismissed.  If liability had been established by the plaintiffs, I
would have awarded damages to Harrison Knox and Sherry Cole in the amount of
$15,000 each, and to Daniel Knox in the amount of $75,000.
[158]      
I encourage the parties to reach an agreement on costs. In order
to facilitate discussions, I am going to allow counsel the month of December
2024 to have fruitful discussions to reach an agreement on costs.  If the parties
are not able to agree to costs by December 31, 2024, then the court will
receive written submissions on the issue of costs from the plaintiffs by January
17, 2025, and from the defendants by January 31, 2025.  There shall be no right
of reply.  The written submissions are to be no longer than five typed pages,
excluding bills of costs and offers to settle.